Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Appointment as District Attorney Emeritus; Compensation and Duties

47-12-80.
Retirement from the office of district attorney and appointment to the office of district attorney emeritus; term of office as district attorney emeritus.

A person who desires to resign from the office of district attorney and accept appointment as a district attorney emeritus shall so advise the Governor in writing. The Governor shall appoint to such position any district attorney who is eligible under Code Section 47-12-60. Upon such appointment and the issuance of a commission by the Governor, the resignation shall automatically become effective.

All persons appointed as district attorney emeritus shall hold such office for life.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 3.

47-12-81.
Practice of law during term of office as district attorney emeritus.

District attorneys emeritus are prohibited from practicing law in any cases against the State of Georgia in any of the courts of this state or of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1805, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 222, repealing this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by §

47-20-50

and, therefore, did not become law and became repealed on July 1, 1990. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1990, p. CCCV.

47-12-82.
Salary for district attorneys emeritus; suspension of office upon eligibility for or appointment to an office of profit or trust under the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Georgia.

Any person holding office as a district attorney emeritus on July 1, 1990, or who is appointed to such position on or after such date shall receive from the State of Georgia an annual salary of $15,000.00 or one-half of the state salary received by such person as a district attorney for the calendar year immediately prior to the person’s retirement and resignation as an active district attorney, whichever is the greater amount. Such annual salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments. The annual salary provided for in this subsection shall apply to the calculation of the amount of spouses’ benefits under Code Section 47-12-42 as applied to persons receiving such benefits on July 1, 1990, and as applied to persons who begin receiving such benefits on or after July 1, 1990.

If a person becomes eligible for appointment or is appointed district attorney emeritus and during such period of eligibility or appointment is elected or appointed to and qualifies for an office of profit or trust under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia, the person’s right to appointment as district attorney emeritus or to continue to hold such an appointment and to draw the salary fixed for that position shall be suspended during the period of time that the person holds such office. Upon ceasing to hold such office, the person shall then be entitled to appointment or reappointment as district attorney emeritus with all the obligations, rights, and duties of that position. The person’s compensation as district attorney emeritus in such event shall be (1) the same amount received by the person as district attorney emeritus at the time of the person’s election or appointment and qualification for the office under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia or (2) if the person was eligible but did not then hold an appointment as district attorney emeritus, an annual salary of $15,000.00 or one-half of the amount of state salary received by such person as district attorney for the calendar year immediately prior to the person’s election or appointment to and qualification for such office under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia, whichever is the greater amount.

The purpose of this Code section is to permit any district attorney who may have been appointed district attorney emeritus under this chapter or who may be eligible for appointment as district attorney emeritus to accept some other office of profit or trust under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia without affecting his then existing rights under this chapter, except to suspend the right to hold that office and receive its salary while holding such other office.

During the time that such district attorney is holding such office under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia, he shall not be required to make any payments in and to the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, effective on July 1, 1990, the monthly salary being paid to each person holding office as a district attorney emeritus on July 1, 1990, shall be increased by $15.00 for each full year which has elapsed from the date of appointment as district attorney emeritus until July 1, 1990.

A district attorney emeritus whose annual salary on June 30, 1990, is less than the minimum annual salary provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall receive either such minimum annual salary or the increase provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection if such increase would result with an annual salary exceeding such minimum annual salary.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 4; Ga. L. 1950, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 1958, p. 163, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1990, p. 511, §§ 1, 2.

47-12-83.
Duties of district attorney emeritus.

It shall be the duty of each district attorney emeritus to consult with and advise the district attorney of his former circuit.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1392, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1805, § 2.

47-12-84.
Disability retirement; determination of disability; continuation of payments to the fund.

Any district attorney who, after 17 years of continuous service and the payment of amounts due under this chapter, becomes unable to perform his official duties because of ill health or other causes may retire under this chapter, provided that he is so certified by the judges of his judicial circuit and two physicians. Any such district attorney shall continue his pro rata payments to the fund for the term as set forth in Code Section 47-12-41.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 211, § 1.

47-12-85.
Resignation from the office of district attorney emeritus; reappointment to office.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who holds the office of district attorney emeritus shall have the right to resign as district attorney emeritus and also to be reappointed as district attorney emeritus upon written request to the Governor. No person shall be eligible to be reappointed more than three times. Upon such resignation, any such person shall cease to receive the salary as provided for in this chapter for a district attorney emeritus. Upon reappointment as district attorney emeritus, such person shall receive the salary he was receiving as district attorney emeritus at the time of his resignation.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1632, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 971, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1392, § 1.

47-12-86.
Withdrawal of payments to the fund; right to participate in the fund after such withdrawal; how payments made on behalf of the district attorney are to be treated.

Any district attorney may, after 30 days’ written notice to the board of trustees, withdraw his total payments, without interest, from the fund. His right to participate in the benefits under this chapter shall cease unless he otherwise qualifies as an active district attorney during a resumed period of payment.

The employee contributions paid by the employer to the fund on behalf of a district attorney under subsection (c) of Code Section 47-12-43 after July 1, 1980, shall be considered to be payments made by the district attorney.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 11; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 18.

47-12-87.
Withdrawal of payments for disqualification from office or retirement; payments made upon the death of the district attorney; payments by employer.

Any district attorney who resigns or otherwise becomes disqualified to hold his office shall be entitled to withdraw the total amount, without interest, which such district attorney has paid to the fund. If any district attorney dies, the total amount, without interest, paid by such district attorney to the fund shall be paid to the district attorney’s surviving spouse, if any, or to such district attorney’s personal representative.

In the case of the death of any district attorney receiving benefits from the fund at the time of death and who is not survived by a spouse or in case of the death of a surviving spouse of a district attorney who is receiving benefits, where neither the district attorney, the surviving spouse, or both, have received the total amount, without interest, paid by the district attorney to the fund, the district attorney’s estate shall receive from the fund the remainder of such payments.

The employee contributions paid by the employer to the fund on behalf of a district attorney under subsection (c) of Code Section 47-12-43 after July 1, 1980, shall be considered to be payments made by the district attorney.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 12; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 18; Ga. L. 1980, p. 939, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 696, § 1.